Connecticut, session 2026, HB05260.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Homeless person" has the same meaning as provided in 42 USC
3 11302, as amended from time to time;
4 (2) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in section 14-1
5 of the general statutes;
6 (3) "Public place" means publicly accessible land owned or managed
7 by a municipality. "Public place" does not include the interior area of a
8 structure located on publicly accessible land, any real property owned
9 by the state and in the custody of the Department of Transportation,
10 commercial airports or parcels of land containing a school;
11 (4) "Recreational vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in
HB5260 / File No. 161 1

HB5260 File No. 161
12 section 14-1 of the general statutes;
13 (5) "School" means nursery schools, kindergarten and grades one to
14 twelve, inclusive; and
15 (6) "Municipality" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148
16 of the general statutes.
17 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 7-148 of the general
18 statutes, no municipality may enact or enforce any ordinance that
19 prohibits a homeless person's ability to:
20 (1) Use or move freely in public places in the same manner as other
21 persons;
22 (2) Occupy or sleep in a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle that is
23 legally parked in a public place;
24 (3) Use any publicly accessible hygiene facility in the same manner as
25 other persons; or
26 (4) Perform the following activities in a public place: (A) Sleep or rest;
27 (B) eat or drink; (C) protect himself or herself from the elements; (D)
28 access medical care; or (E) solicit food, water, money or other donations.
29 (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
30 municipality from enacting or enforcing an ordinance to prohibit
31 activities that endanger or are likely to endanger the health, welfare or
32 safety of the public.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
HSG Joint Favorable
HB5260 / File No. 161 2

HB5260 File No. 161
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which prohibits municipalities from adopting or enforcing
ordinances that prohibit a homeless person from certain activities, does
not result in a fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5260 / File No. 161 3

HB5260 File No. 161
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5260
AN ACT PROHIBITING A MUNICIPALITY FROM IMPOSING A
PENALTY FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF CERTAIN ACTIVITIES OF
DAILY LIVING.